SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3504 Y 1
SFX 3504 a irdin a
SFX 4694 Y 1
SFX 4694 n yiti n
SFX 951 Y 1
SFX 951 a iridimu a
SFX 2103 Y 1
SFX 2103 q mda q
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 r mda r
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 q ke q
SFX 1008 Y 1
SFX 1008 a ighanliqidin a
SFX 4848 Y 1
SFX 4848 r ke r
SFX 4121 Y 1
SFX 4121 s ke s
SFX 2745 Y 1
SFX 2745 t ke t
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 i uwatqan i
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 l nlargha l
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 m nlargha m
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 a mighanliqi a
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 a ditish a
SFX 1884 Y 1
SFX 1884 q nlargha q
SFX 3711 Y 1
SFX 3711 r irdin r
SFX 1833 Y 1
SFX 1833 a raq a
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 a tuq a
SFX 1411 Y 1
SFX 1411 d raq d
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 m nmidi m
SFX 4930 Y 1
SFX 4930 i enla i
SFX 733 Y 1
SFX 733 q lmay q
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 r lmay r
SFX 1605 Y 1
SFX 1605 r nmidi r
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 a iqim a
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 r shnila r
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 n yliq n
SFX 4906 Y 1
SFX 4906 a ighandikin a
SFX 4511 Y 1
SFX 4511 t raq t
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 m ngizgha m
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 i glargha i
SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 l mler l
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 p ngizgha p
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 a uni a
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 i etmu i
SFX 1463 Y 1
SFX 1463 k lmidi k
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 i uni i
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 i enliki i
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 a iliridin a
SFX 888 Y 1
SFX 888 q lmidi q
SFX 3948 Y 1
SFX 3948 a eshtrl a
SFX 542 Y 1
SFX 542 r lmidi r
SFX 1679 Y 1
SFX 1679 m enliki m
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 o uni o
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 r shtuq r
SFX 4532 Y 1
SFX 4532 k nidiken k
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 i urghin i
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 m nidiken m
SFX 1867 Y 1
SFX 1867 p wlishning p
SFX 3609 Y 1
SFX 3609 d ride d
SFX 2996 Y 1
SFX 2996 q nidiken q
SFX 3084 Y 1
SFX 3084 i chiliqning i
SFX 4763 Y 1
SFX 4763 s qchimiz s
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 i rlsh i
SFX 4612 Y 1
SFX 4612 a isidila a
SFX 3394 Y 1
SFX 3394 p wlipla p
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 t ride t
SFX 1262 Y 1
SFX 1262 k ldin k
SFX 4599 Y 1
SFX 4599 q ldin q
SFX 3866 Y 1
SFX 3866 q lmaymiz q
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 r lmaymiz r
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 q kte q
SFX 4331 Y 1
SFX 4331 r kte r
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 s kte s
SFX 4021 Y 1
SFX 4021 i rwtidu i
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 a siman a
SFX 1876 Y 1
SFX 1876 d siman d
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 n yisini n
SFX 1806 Y 1
SFX 1806 a irimizgha a
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 a un a
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 l mliq l
SFX 1421 Y 1
SFX 1421 a iwetti a
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 a qanidi a
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 a erdin a
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 i un i
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 r shturush r
SFX 2604 Y 1
SFX 2604 r siman r
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 l nim l
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 t siman t
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 t shturush t
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 m nim m
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 o un o
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 k lmeytti k
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 i erdin i
SFX 1056 Y 1
SFX 1056 k erdin k
SFX 3695 Y 1
SFX 3695 a iyalaysiz a
SFX 3594 Y 1
SFX 3594 z siman z
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 i rshtin i
SFX 4084 Y 1
SFX 4084 r lmeytti r
SFX 4781 Y 1
SFX 4781 m nimni m
SFX 3743 Y 1
SFX 3743 d ghanliq d
SFX 3596 Y 1
SFX 3596 r shturulup r
SFX 4488 Y 1
SFX 4488 r shturuwetti r
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 p wtinglar p
SFX 655 Y 1
SFX 655 i unglar i
SFX 3794 Y 1
SFX 3794 a uchidin a
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 a iqingiz a
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 s ghanliq s
SFX 3896 Y 1
SFX 3896 a lardiki a
SFX 1323 Y 1
SFX 1323 r ndrsh r
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 a ixan a
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 a ikilerni a
SFX 4186 Y 1
SFX 4186 p chn p
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 s lardiki s
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 r zin r
SFX 756 Y 1
SFX 756 a imidi a
SFX 3490 Y 1
SFX 3490 o ixan o
SFX 2860 Y 1
SFX 2860 p ngliri p
SFX 4141 Y 1
SFX 4141 a inglargha a
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 a xana a
SFX 624 Y 1
SFX 624 i unggha i
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 l mche l
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 a mu a
SFX 2176 Y 1
SFX 2176 k mining k
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 a iwalghandin a
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 l mining l
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 a iklirini a
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 d mu d
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 a maydiken a
SFX 3759 Y 1
SFX 3759 t dung t
SFX 361 Y 1
SFX 361 k mu k
SFX 3758 Y 1
SFX 3758 x dung x
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 l mu l
SFX 3848 Y 1
SFX 3848 m nat m
SFX 995 Y 1
SFX 995 i urmaqchi i
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 r shtr r
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 q mu q
SFX 4734 Y 1
SFX 4734 t shtr t
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 l maydiken l
SFX 904 Y 1
SFX 904 r mu r
SFX 4704 Y 1
SFX 4704 t xana t
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 s mu s
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 t mu t
SFX 1286 Y 1
SFX 1286 a uchilarning a
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 i umdin i
SFX 1377 Y 1
SFX 1377 i urghanidi i
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 z mu z
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 a imaqta a
SFX 4786 Y 1
SFX 4786 p ngching p
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 m nliridin m
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 a ime a
SFX 3857 Y 1
SFX 3857 l midur l
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 a bi a
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 i urulup i
SFX 2099 Y 1
SFX 2099 a na a
SFX 3694 Y 1
SFX 3694 a iyalmaydighan a
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 k na k
SFX 903 Y 1
SFX 903 l na l
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 m na m
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 r na r
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 s na s
SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 t na t
SFX 3860 Y 1
SFX 3860 a maymiz a
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 a izmu a
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 i rlidighan i
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 z na z
SFX 4291 Y 1
SFX 4291 q mdighan q
SFX 2314 Y 1
SFX 2314 i uruwtish i
SFX 3304 Y 1
SFX 3304 l maymiz l
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 i rgenidi i
SFX 4527 Y 1
SFX 4527 m nju m
SFX 1012 Y 1
SFX 1012 i chiler i
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 q lmaytti q
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 r lmaytti r
SFX 2796 Y 1
SFX 2796 m chiler m
SFX 4039 Y 1
SFX 4039 q nliqidin q
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 i uldi i
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 d liki d
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 p watqanlarni p
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 a ilik a
SFX 4516 Y 1
SFX 4516 r qlirigha r
SFX 2638 Y 1
SFX 2638 k liki k
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 m nlirining m
SFX 4317 Y 1
SFX 4317 s liki s
SFX 1074 Y 1
SFX 1074 a inishtin a
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 p walghanliqini p
SFX 4224 Y 1
SFX 4224 d singizla d
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 k meytti k
SFX 4277 Y 1
SFX 4277 l nchi l
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 a iqimu a
SFX 1137 Y 1
SFX 1137 m nchi m
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 m imge m
SFX 4492 Y 1
SFX 4492 r shme r
SFX 2505 Y 1
SFX 2505 i rdm i
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 a ular a
SFX 3804 Y 1
SFX 3804 r shturghili r
SFX 3966 Y 1
SFX 3966 r zlinish r
SFX 2844 Y 1
SFX 2844 r qla r
SFX 4662 Y 1
SFX 4662 d ghinini d
SFX 2416 Y 1
SFX 2416 s qla s
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 i ular i
SFX 4179 Y 1
SFX 4179 a durghan a
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 k yesi k
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 i chiliq i
SFX 1574 Y 1
SFX 1574 i hunas i
SFX 3772 Y 1
SFX 3772 r zu r
SFX 2307 Y 1
SFX 2307 l chiliq l
SFX 4684 Y 1
SFX 4684 n chiliq n
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 p chiliq p
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 r shmidi r
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 i rnglar i
SFX 4429 Y 1
SFX 4429 y chiliq y
SFX 3115 Y 1
SFX 3115 t rsiz t
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 a ildi a
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 k lda k
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 m nch m
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 q lda q
SFX 3905 Y 1
SFX 3905 a ishti a
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 r lda r
SFX 2603 Y 1
SFX 2603 a ugha a
SFX 2147 Y 1
SFX 2147 p wteyli p
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 i unglarni i
SFX 3400 Y 1
SFX 3400 i ursun i
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 a ighanidi a
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 i ugha i
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 r shturushmaq r
SFX 2820 Y 1
SFX 2820 o ugha o
SFX 2875 Y 1
SFX 2875 q lmasliqi q
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 r lmasliqi r
SFX 1034 Y 1
SFX 1034 a ilarmu a
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 a us a
SFX 3659 Y 1
SFX 3659 a men a
SFX 3865 Y 1
SFX 3865 a lr a
SFX 2346 Y 1
SFX 2346 a maytti a
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 d men d
SFX 4568 Y 1
SFX 4568 k lmekte k
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 i us i
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 a iningiz a
SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 a ilar a
SFX 2521 Y 1
SFX 2521 k men k
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 l men l
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 o us o
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 a ishmaq a
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 l maytti l
SFX 2727 Y 1
SFX 2727 q men q
SFX 3661 Y 1
SFX 3661 q maytti q
SFX 2051 Y 1
SFX 2051 l ilar l
SFX 4972 Y 1
SFX 4972 p walghuche p
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 o ilar o
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 s qmaq s
SFX 2082 Y 1
SFX 2082 a sh a
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 d sh d
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 i sh i
SFX 2916 Y 1
SFX 2916 a ighanliqim a
SFX 1788 Y 1
SFX 1788 p sh p
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 q lghachqa q
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 r sh r
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 t sh t
SFX 1523 Y 1
SFX 1523 a isidek a
SFX 34 Y 1
SFX 34 a idi a
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 q lghanda q
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 z sh z
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 p wtishi p
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 d idi d
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 a igha a
SFX 1738 Y 1
SFX 1738 r shqimu r
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 l idi l
SFX 1244 Y 1
SFX 1244 i ushni i
SFX 4391 Y 1
SFX 4391 n idi n
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 d igha d
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 o idi o
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 t jining t
SFX 3777 Y 1
SFX 3777 n ylarni n
SFX 3254 Y 1
SFX 3254 b tni b
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 l igha l
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 m igha m
SFX 3408 Y 1
SFX 3408 r sige r
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 n igha n
SFX 490 Y 1
SFX 490 o igha o
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 s igha s
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 a isanglar a
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 t igha t
SFX 4486 Y 1
SFX 4486 z sige z
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 q lush q
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 k ysiler k
SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 m nliqini m
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 n ysiler n
SFX 1346 Y 1
SFX 1346 q ysiler q
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 q nliqini q
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 s ysiler s
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 a lash a
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 m nay m
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 a eshti a
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 p ettuq p
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 p wtishidin p
SFX 3566 Y 1
SFX 3566 n yr n
SFX 3207 Y 1
SFX 3207 i etliri i
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 a isaqmu a
SFX 2350 Y 1
SFX 2350 d lash d
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 q nay q
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 a iridek a
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 k lash k
SFX 4803 Y 1
SFX 4803 k meng k
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 a turup a
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 p watqandek p
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 i gizning i
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 q lash q
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 r lash r
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 s lash s
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 t lash t
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 d rdek d
SFX 4977 Y 1
SFX 4977 i ushluq i
SFX 4237 Y 1
SFX 4237 a rit a
SFX 1235 Y 1
SFX 1235 a ighandu a
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 d rit d
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 i uldimaq i
SFX 1284 Y 1
SFX 1284 p watqaniken p
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 a irimizmu a
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 n yini n
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 t rdek t
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 a isini a
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 a ishidighan a
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 n yin n
SFX 2645 Y 1
SFX 2645 l isini l
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 m nghanidi m
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 o isini o
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 p wettim p
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 a ilishish a
SFX 977 Y 1
SFX 977 i rshni i
SFX 2998 Y 1
SFX 2998 r nghanidi r
SFX 2069 Y 1
SFX 2069 a urmaq a
SFX 2650 Y 1
SFX 2650 a iqidek a
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 a ishishni a
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 a imighan a
SFX 1443 Y 1
SFX 1443 i urulushi i
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 r zghan r
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 i urmaq i
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 p walidu p
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 a ghu a
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 a durulush a
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 d ghu d
SFX 3703 Y 1
SFX 3703 a ist a
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 a ininglar a
SFX 4002 Y 1
SFX 4002 a tinmu a
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 a ilip a
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 r ghu r
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 s ghu s
SFX 3698 Y 1
SFX 3698 a iwalsa a
SFX 4712 Y 1
SFX 4712 i urushti i
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 p walay p
SFX 4892 Y 1
SFX 4892 l ilip l
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 z ghu z
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 o ilip o
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 a iqidiki a
SFX 2612 Y 1
SFX 2612 a qandin a
SFX 69 Y 1
SFX 69 a iqi a
SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 a irida a
SFX 4862 Y 1
SFX 4862 a iwaldim a
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 a id a
SFX 4959 Y 1
SFX 4959 n yghan n
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 r shturul r
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 d id d
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 l iqi l
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 i unda i
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 o iqi o
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 a linish a
SFX 3198 Y 1
SFX 3198 a ghanda a
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 q iqi q
SFX 4161 Y 1
SFX 4161 l id l
SFX 3875 Y 1
SFX 3875 d linish d
SFX 1629 Y 1
SFX 1629 d ghanda d
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 o id o
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 k linish k
SFX 4879 Y 1
SFX 4879 a inimizni a
SFX 4174 Y 1
SFX 4174 m enlerdin m
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 q linish q
SFX 126 Y 1
SFX 126 a ilirini a
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 r linish r
SFX 1560 Y 1
SFX 1560 s linish s
SFX 1701 Y 1
SFX 1701 k mini k
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 t linish t
SFX 2130 Y 1
SFX 2130 s ghanda s
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 l mini l
SFX 1157 Y 1
SFX 1157 t ghanda t
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 a igini a
SFX 4285 Y 1
SFX 4285 r mini r
SFX 3511 Y 1
SFX 3511 l ilirini l
